Hawaii, session 2026, HB2153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that sworn law enforcement personnel of the department of law enforcement perform statewide public safety functions that are essential to the protection of life, property, and the rule of law throughout the State. These functions include providing law enforcement services at the courts, the Hawaii state capitol, airports, and harbors, as well as conducting cyber investigations, agricultural enforcement, fireworks enforcement, warrant service, evictions, and participation in joint state and federal task force operations.  The department's responsibilities are specialized, high-risk, and statewide in scope, requiring advanced training, certification, and operational readiness. The legislature further finds that significant disparities in compensation exist between sworn personnel employed by the department of law enforcement and similarly situated sworn officers employed by county police departments.  These disparities have created a persistent and growing gap in pay for comparable training, certification, risk exposure, and professional responsibility. The legislature recognizes that the department of law enforcement competes in the same labor market for qualified sworn officers but is constrained by salary structures that are materially lower than those offered by county police departments.  As a result, the department faces increasing difficulty in recruiting new officers, retaining experienced personnel, and preventing the loss of trained staff to higher-paying law enforcement agencies.  This turnover diminishes institutional knowledge, increases overtime and training costs, and weakens the continuity and effectiveness of statewide law enforcement operations. The legislature additionally finds that recruiting and retaining sworn personnel is particularly challenging given Hawaii's high cost of living, demanding work conditions, and the specialized nature of the department's mission.  Without targeted intervention, the department will continue to experience staffing instability that threatens operational readiness and public safety. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish, and appropriate funds for, the kūpaʻa law enforcement retention bonus program to provide law enforcement officers retention bonuses. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established the kūpaʻa law enforcement retention bonus program within the department of law enforcement to promote recruitment, retention, and continuity of service within the department of law enforcement by providing law enforcement officers retention bonuses. (b)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if negotiated through collective bargaining under section 89-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, beginning July 1, 2026, the department of law enforcement shall provide a retention bonus of $15,000 to any law enforcement officer appointed pursuant to section 353C-4(a), Hawaii Revised Statutes, who: (1)  Is a full-time employee of the department of law enforcement; (2)  Is vested with law enforcement authority under state law; and (3)  Has worked a minimum of two thousand hours during the preceding fiscal year; provided that this minimum hour requirement shall include regular duty hours and approved overtime, sick leave, and vacation leave. (c)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if negotiated through collective bargaining under section 89-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the department of law enforcement may change any of the requirements established pursuant to subsection (b) each fiscal year for the duration of the kūpaʻa law enforcement retention bonus program. (d)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if negotiated through collective bargaining under section 89-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the retention bonus awarded pursuant to this section shall be a: (1)  Non-base, non-pensionable payment that is not included in the calculation of base salary, retirement benefits, or any other salary-based benefit; and (2)  One-time payment awarded in addition to a law enforcement officer's regular salary. (e)  The department of law enforcement shall maintain records related to the kūpaʻa law enforcement retention bonus program, including: (1)  The number of law enforcement officers receiving retention bonuses; (2)  The years of service of the law enforcement officers receiving retention bonuses; (3)  The assignment categories of the law enforcement officers receiving retention bonuses; and (4)  Any other information the department of law enforcement deems necessary to administer the program. The department of law enforcement shall provide the information maintained pursuant to this subsection in aggregate form and shall not disclose personally identifiable information except as required under chapter 92F, Hawaii Revised Statutes. (f)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if negotiated through collective bargaining under section 89-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the department of law enforcement may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, necessary to administer the kūpaʻa law enforcement retention bonus program. (g)  The department of law enforcement shall submit a report to the legislature no later than December 1, 2028, evaluating the effectiveness of the kūpaʻa law enforcement retention bonus program. The report shall include, at minimum: (1)  The records collected pursuant to subsection (e); (2)  Data regarding changes in vacancy rates, turnover, and average length of service among law enforcement officers during the program's implementation; (3)  An assessment of the program's impact on recruitment, retention, and operation readiness; (4)  A fiscal analysis comparing costs of the program with savings or cost avoidance attributable to reduced overtime, reduced training and onboarding of new law enforcement officers, and improved workforce stability; and (5)  Any recommendations regarding the extension, modification, or termination of the program. (h)  The kūpaʻa law enforcement retention bonus program shall end on June 30, 2028; provided that any obligations properly incurred before June 30, 2028, may be paid. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the kūpaʻa law enforcement retention bonus program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  The appropriation made by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.